Hawaii statutes.
§342G-85 Container inventory report and
payment. (a) Payment of the advance glass disposal fee shall be made
quarterly based on inventory reports of the glass container importers, except
for those importers subject to subsection (c) or (d). All glass container
importers shall submit to the department documentation in sufficient detail
that identifies the number of glass deposit beverage and glass non-deposit
beverage containers manufactured or imported to the State and sold or
distributed, by manufacturer or distributor, during the calendar year.

(b) Until September 30, 2004, the amount due
from glass container importers less glass containers exported for the calendar
year shall be the sum equal to the number of glass containers provided in
subsection (a) multiplied by the advance disposal fee specified in section
342G-82. Beginning October 1, 2004, the amount due from glass container
importers shall be the sum equal to the number of non-deposit beverage glass
containers provided in subsection (a), less non-deposit beverage glass
containers exported, and multiplied by the advance disposal fee. Payment shall
be made by check or money order payable to the "Department of Health,
State of Hawaii". All subsequent inventory reports and payments shall be
made not later than the fifteenth day of the month following the end of the
previous calendar quarter, except for those importers subject to subsection
(d).

(c) Until September 30, 2004, a glass
container importer who imports fewer than five thousand glass containers within
a one-year period shall be exempt from payment of the fee. Any empty, imported
glass container designed to hold not more than two and one-half fluid ounces of
a product meant for human consumption shall be exempt from the fee. Beginning
October 1, 2004, a glass container importer who imports or manufactures in the
State fewer [than] five thousand non-deposit beverage glass containers within a
one-year period shall be exempt from payment of the fee.

(d) Until September 30, 2004, a glass
container importer who imports five thousand or more glass containers, but less
than or equal to one hundred thousand glass containers, shall be permitted to
provide a report and payment of the fee annually, rather than quarterly.
Beginning October 1, 2004, a glass container importer who imports or
manufactures in the State five thousand or more non-deposit beverage glass
containers, but less than or equal to one hundred thousand non-deposit beverage
glass containers, shall be permitted to provide a report and payment of the fee
annually, rather than quarterly. [L 1994, c 201, pt of §2; am L 1998, c 253,
§2; am L 1999, c 108, §1; am L 2002, c 176, §12]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next